apertium-en-pl/apertium-en-pl.pl.dix.xml
    <pardef n="ki/ć__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ć</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cia</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ciowi</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ciem</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ciu</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ciu</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cie</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ciów</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ciom</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ciami</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ciach</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cia</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cie</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cie</l>
          <r>ć<s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="maj/__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>owi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ów</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ami</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ach</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="korab/__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ia</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iowi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iem</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iu</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iu</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iów</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iom</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iami</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iach</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ia</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="koc/__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>owi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ów</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ami</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ach</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="kić"><i>ki</i><par n="ki/ć__n"/></e>
    <e lm="maj"><i>maj</i><par n="maj/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="korab"><i>korab</i><par n="korab/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="koc"><i>koc</i><par n="koc/__n"/></e>
